Rhode Island, session 2026, HB8627.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any other general or special law to the contrary, Meghan
Elizabeth McEntee may join Taylor Lauren Criscuolo and Michael Joseph McEntee Jr., in marriage
within the Town of Narragansett, Rhode Island on or about September 25, 2026. Meghan Elizabeth
McEntee is hereby authorized and empowered to join the foregoing persons in marriage pursuant
to and in accordance with Chapter 3 of Title 15 of the General laws, entitled “Solemnization of
Marriages.”
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC006592
========